North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 24A. Delinquency Prevention and Youth Services. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-289.13 through 7A-289.16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 1(a).

Cross References.

For the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-100

et seq.

§§ 7A-289.17 through 7A-289.21.

Reserved for future codification purposes.